North Carolina statutes. Chapter 104E. North Carolina Radiation Protection Act.
§ 104E-9.1.
Restrictions on use and operation of tanning equipment.

Operators of tanning equipment and owners of tanning facilities subject to rules adopted pursuant to this Chapter shall comply with or ensure compliance with the following:

The operator shall provide to each consumer a warning statement that defines the potential hazards and consequences of exposure to ultraviolet radiation. Before allowing the consumer’s initial use of the tanning equipment, the operator shall obtain the signature of the consumer on the warning statement acknowledging receipt of the warning.

The operator shall not allow a person under 18 years of age to use tanning equipment.

Neither an operator nor an owner shall claim or distribute promotional materials that claim that using tanning equipment is safe or free from risk or that using tanning equipment will result in medical or health benefits.

The Commission may adopt, and the Department shall enforce, rules to implement this section. The requirements of this section are in addition to other rules adopted pursuant to this Chapter that are applicable to tanning facilities and do not conflict with this section.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the term:

“Consumer” means any individual who is provided access to a tanning facility that is subject to registration and regulation under this Chapter.

“Tanning equipment” means ultraviolet or other lamps and equipment containing such lamps intended to induce skin tanning through the irradiation of any part of the living human body with ultraviolet radiation.

“Tanning facility” means any location, place, area, structure, or business that provides consumers access to tanning equipment. For the purpose of this definition, tanning equipment registered to different persons at the same location and tanning equipment registered to the same person, but at separate locations, shall constitute separate tanning facilities.

History.

2004-157, s. 1; 2015-21, s. 2.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2015-21, s. 1, provides: “This act shall be known as the Jim Fulghum Teen Skin Cancer Prevention Act.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-21, s. 2, effective October 1, 2015, rewrote subdivision (a)(2).

§ 104E-10.
Licensing of by-product, source, and special nuclear materials and other sources of ionizing radiation.

The Governor, on behalf of this State, is authorized to enter into agreements with the federal government providing for discontinuance of certain of the responsibilities of the federal government with respect to sources of ionizing radiation and the assumption thereof by this State.

Upon the signing of an agreement with the Nuclear Regulatory Commission or its successor as provided in subsection (a) above, the Commission shall provide by rule or regulation for general or specific licensing of persons to use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own, or possess by-product, source, or special nuclear materials or devices, installations, or equipment utilizing such materials. Such rule or regulation shall provide for amendment, suspension, renewal or revocation of licenses. Each application for a specific license shall be in writing on forms prescribed by the Commission and furnished by the Department and shall state, and be accompanied by, such information or documents, including, but not limited to plans, specifications and reports for new construction or material alterations as the Commission may determine to be reasonable and necessary to decide the qualifications of the applicant to protect the public health and safety. The Commission may require all applications or statements to be made under oath or affirmation. Each license shall be in such form and contain such terms and conditions as the Commission may deem necessary. No license issued under the authority of this Chapter and no right to possess or utilize sources of radiation granted by any license shall be assigned or in any manner disposed of; and the terms and conditions of all licenses shall be subject to amendment, revision, or modification by rules, regulations, or orders issued in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.

Any person who, on the effective date of an agreement under subsection (a) above, possesses a license issued by the federal government shall be deemed to possess the same pursuant to a license issued under this Chapter, which shall expire either 90 days after receipt from the Department of a notice of expiration of such license, or on the date of expiration specified in the federal license, whichever is earlier.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 850, s. 6.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1979, c. 694, s. 1; 1981, c. 704, s. 11.1; 1987, c. 850, s. 6.

§ 104E-10.1.
Additional requirements for low-level radioactive waste facilities.

An applicant for a license for a low-level radioactive facility shall satisfy the Department that:

Any low-level radioactive waste facility heretofore constructed or operated by the applicant (or any parent or subsidiary corporation if the applicant is a corporation) has been operated in accordance with sound waste management practices and in substantial compliance with federal and state laws and regulations; and

The applicant (or any parent or subsidiary corporation if the applicant is a corporation) is financially qualified to operate the subject low-level radioactive waste facility.

(a1)

The approval of a license shall be contingent upon the applicant first satisfying the Department that the applicant has met the above two requirements. In order to continue to hold a license under this Chapter, a licensee must remain financially qualified, and must provide any information requested by the Department to show that the licensee continues to be financially qualified.

Each license applicant or license holder or any parent or subsidiary corporation if the license applicant or license holder is a corporation, as a condition of receiving or holding a license, shall have an independent annual audit by a firm of duly licensed certified public accountants carrying a minimum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) professional liability insurance coverage, proof of which coverage shall be provided with the issuance of the audit report. Each license applicant or license holder referred to above shall also provide the Department with a copy of the report and shall submit a copy of the report to the State Auditor for approval regarding its adequacy and completeness. As a minimum, the required report shall include the financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, all disclosures in the public interest required by law, and the auditor’s opinion and comments relating to the financial statements. The audit shall be performed in conformity with generally accepted auditing standards.

Within 10 days of receiving an application for a license or an amendment to a license to operate a low-level radioactive waste facility, the Department shall notify the clerk of the board of commissioners of the county or counties in which the facility is proposed to be located or is located, and, if the facility is to be located or is located within a city, the clerk of the governing board of the city, that the application has been filed, and shall file a copy of the application with the clerk. Prior to issuing a license or an amendment to an existing license the Secretary or the Secretary’s designee shall conduct a public hearing in the county, or in one of the counties, in which a person proposes to operate a low-level radioactive waste facility or to enlarge an existing facility. The Secretary shall give notice of the hearing at least 30 days prior to the date thereof by:

Publication in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in the county or counties where the facility is to be located for three consecutive weeks beginning 30 days prior to the scheduled date of the hearing; and

First class mail to persons who have requested such notice. The Department shall maintain a mailing list of persons who request notice pursuant to this subsection.

History.

1981, c. 704, s. 11; 1985, c. 529; 1987, c. 24, ss. 1-3; c. 850, ss. 7, 8; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(20); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2007-495, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-495, s. 10, effective August 30, 2007, substituted “license” for “permit” throughout the section; deleted “of Environment and Natural Resources” following “above shall also provide the Department” in the second sentence of subsection (b); in subsection (c), deleted “of the Department” following “an existing license the Secretary” and substituted “the Secretary’s” for “his” in the second sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 104E-10.2.
Conveyance of property used for radioactive material disposal.

A license to dispose of radioactive waste materials on land shall include a legal description of the disposal site that would be sufficient as a description in an instrument of conveyance. The license to dispose of radioactive waste materials shall not be effective unless the owner of the disposal site files a certified copy of the license in the register of deeds’ office in the county or counties in which the site is located. The register of deeds shall record the certified copy of the license and index it in the grantor index under the name of the owner of the land. When any such site is sold, leased, conveyed or transferred in any manner, the deed or other instrument of transfer shall contain in the description section in no smaller type than that used in the body of the deed or instrument a statement that the property has been used as a disposal site for radioactive waste materials and a reference by book and page to the recordation of the license.

History.

1981, c. 480, s. 1.

§ 104E-10.3.
Low-level radioactive waste facility access licenses.

The Commission shall provide by regulation for the licensing of access to any low-level radioactive waste facility located in the State. No person shall send waste to a low-level radioactive waste facility unless licensed or otherwise authorized to do so by the Department. No low-level radioactive waste facility shall receive waste from any source not licensed by the Department except as may be otherwise specifically authorized by the Department. Such regulations shall provide, at a minimum, for amendment, suspension, or revocation of licenses, and for authorization for access to a low-level radioactive waste facility by the Department on a temporary or emergency basis. Each application for a license or amendment shall be in writing and shall include such information as may be required by regulation, and such additional information as the Department deems necessary. The application for a license shall set forth the manner in which the applicant plans to comply with the requirements of this Chapter and regulations promulgated thereunder. Upon receipt of an application under this section the Department shall review the application and shall issue a license only if it finds that the applicant is fully qualified under all applicable laws and regulation.

History.

1987, c. 850, s. 9.

§ 104E-11.
Inspections, agreements, and educational programs.

Authorized representatives of the Department shall have the authority to enter upon any public or private property, other than a private dwelling, at all reasonable times for the purpose of determining compliance with the provisions of this Chapter and rules, regulations and standards adopted hereunder.

After approval by the Commission, the Governor is authorized to enter into agreements with the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies, whereby this State will perform on a cooperative basis with the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies, inspections, emergency response to radiation accidents, and other functions related to the control of radiation.

The Department is authorized to institute educational programs for the purpose of training or educating persons who may possess, use, handle, transport, or service radioactive materials or radiation machines.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1.

§ 104E-12.
Records.

The Commission is authorized to require each person who possesses or uses a source of radiation:

To maintain appropriate records relating to its receipt, storage, use, transfer, or disposal and maintain such other records as the Commission may require, subject to such exemptions as may be provided by the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commission; and

To maintain appropriate records showing the radiation exposure of all individuals for whom personnel monitoring may be required by the Commission, subject to such exemptions as may be provided by the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commission.

Copies of all records required to be kept by this subsection shall be submitted to the Department or its duly authorized agents upon request.

The Commission is authorized to require that any person possessing or using a source of radiation furnish to each employee for whom personnel monitoring is required a copy of such employee’s personal exposure record upon the request of such employee, at any time such employee has received radiation exposure in excess of limits established in the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commission, and upon termination of employment.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1.

§ 104E-13.
Administrative procedures and judicial review.

The Department may refuse to grant a license as provided in

G.S. 104E-7

or 104E-10 to any applicant who does not possess the requirements or qualifications which the Commission may prescribe in rules and regulations. The Department may suspend, revoke, or amend any license in the event that the person to whom such license was granted violates any of the rules and regulations of the Commission, or ceases, or fails to have the reasonable facilities prescribed by the Commission: Provided, that before any order is entered denying an application for a license or suspending, revoking, or amending a license previously granted, the applicant or person to whom such license was granted shall be given notice and granted a hearing as provided in Chapter 150B of the North Carolina General Statutes.

Whenever the Department in its opinion determines that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health and safety the Department may, without notice or hearing, issue an order reciting the existence of such emergency and requiring that such action be taken as is necessary to meet the emergency. Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter, such order shall be effective immediately. Any person to whom such order is directed shall comply therewith immediately, and on application to the Department shall be afforded a hearing within 10 days. On the basis of such hearing, the emergency order shall be continued, modified, or revoked within 30 days after such hearing, as the Department may deem appropriate under the evidence.

Any applicant or person to whom a license was granted who shall be aggrieved by any order of the Department or its duly authorized agent denying such application or suspending, revoking, or amending such license may appeal directly to the superior court as provided in Chapter 150B of the North Carolina General Statutes.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1987, c. 850, s. 10.

§ 104E-14.
Impounding of materials.

Authorized representatives of the Department shall have the authority in the event of an emergency to impound or order the impounding of sources of radiation in the possession of any person who is not equipped to observe or fails to observe the provisions of this Chapter or any rules or regulations promulgated by the Commission.

The Department may release such sources of radiation to the owner thereof upon terms and conditions in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter and rules and regulations adopted hereunder or may bring an action in the appropriate superior court for an order condemning such sources of radiation and providing for the destruction or other disposition so as to protect the public health and safety.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1.

§ 104E-15.
Transportation of radioactive materials.

The Radiation Protection Commission is authorized to adopt, promulgate, amend, and repeal rules and regulations governing the transportation of radioactive materials in North Carolina, which, in the judgment of the Commission, shall promote the public health, safety, or welfare and protect the environment.

Such rules and regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, provisions for the use of signs designating radioactive material cargo; for the packing, marking, loading, and handling of radioactive materials, and the precautions necessary to determine whether the material when offered is in proper condition for transport, and may include designation of routes in this State which are to be used for the transportation of radioactive materials.

Such rules and regulations shall not include the carrier vehicle or its equipment, the licensing of packages, nor shall they apply to the handling or transportation of radioactive material within the confines of a facility licensed by or owned by a federal agency.

The Commission is authorized to adopt by reference, in whole or in part, such federal rules and regulations governing the transportation of radioactive material which are established by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, the United States Department of Transportation, or the United States Postal Service (or any federal agency which is a successor to any of the foregoing agencies), as such federal rules may be amended from time to time.

The Department is authorized to enter into agreements with the respective federal agencies designed to avoid conflict or duplication of effort in enforcement and inspection activities so that:

Rules and regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to this section of this Chapter may be enforced, within their respective jurisdictions, by any authorized representatives of the Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Transportation, according to mutual understandings between such departments of their respective responsibilities and authorities.

The Department, through any authorized representative, is authorized to inspect any records of persons engaged in the transportation of radioactive materials during the hours of business operation when such records reasonably relate to the method or contents of packing, marking, loading, handling, or shipping of radioactive materials within the State.

The Department, through any authorized representative, may enter upon and inspect the premises or vehicles of any person engaged in the transportation of radioactive materials during hours of business operation, with or without a warrant, for the purpose of determining compliance with the provisions of this Chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commission.

Upon a determination by the Department that any provision of this section, or the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commission are being violated or that any practice in the transportation of radioactive materials constitutes a clear and imminent danger to the public health, property, or safety, it shall issue an order requiring correction as provided in G.S. 104E-13(b).

History.

1975, c. 716, s. 7; c. 718, s. 1; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(22); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2015-264, s. 54(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (b)(1).

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 54(c), effective October 1, 2015, substituted “conflict or duplication of effort” for “duplication of effort and/or conflict” in the introductory language of subsection (b) and substituted “Department of Health and Human Services” for “Department of Environmental Quality” in subdivision (b)(1).

§ 104E-16.
Nonreverting Radiation Protection Fund.

There is hereby established under the control and direction of the Department a Nonreverting Radiation Protection Fund which shall be used to defray the expenses of any project or activity for:

Emergency response to and decontamination of radiation accidents as provided in G.S. 104E-9(a)(5), or

Perpetual maintenance and custody of radioactive materials as the Department may undertake.In addition to any moneys that shall be appropriated or otherwise made available to it, the Fund may be maintained by fees, charges, or other moneys paid to or recovered by or on behalf of the Department under the provisions of this Chapter, except for the clear proceeds of penalties. Any moneys paid to or recovered by or on behalf of the Department as fees, charges, or other payments authorized by this Chapter, except for the clear proceeds of penalties, shall be paid to the Radiation Protection Fund in an amount equal to the sum expended for the projects or activities in subdivisions (1) and (2) above.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 850, s. 11.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1981, c. 704, s. 11.2; 1987, c. 633, s. 8; c. 850, s. 11; 1998-215, s. 47(b).

§ 104E-17.
Payments to State and local agencies.

Upon completion of any project or activity stated in

G.S. 104E-16

(a)(1), and from time to time during any project or activity stated in

G.S. 104E-16

(a)(2), each State and local agency that has participated by furnishing personnel, equipment or material shall deliver to the Department a record of the expenses incurred by the agency. The amount of incurred expenses shall be disbursed by the Secretary of Health and Human Services to each such agency from the Radiation Protection Fund. Upon completion of any project or activity stated in G.S. 104E-16(a)(1), and from time to time during any project or activity stated in G.S. 104E-16(a)(2), the Secretary of Health and Human Services shall prepare a statement of all expenses and costs of the project or activity expended by the State and shall make demand for payment upon the person having control over the radioactive materials or the release thereof which necessitated said project or activity. Any person having control over the radioactive materials or the release thereof and any other person causing or contributing to an incident necessitating any project or activity stated in G.S. 104E-16 shall be directly liable to the State for the necessary expenses incurred thereby and the State shall have a cause of action to recover from any or all such persons. If the person having control over the radioactive materials or the release thereof shall fail or refuse to pay the sum expended by the State, the Secretary of Health and Human Services shall refer the matter to the Attorney General of North Carolina, who shall institute an action in the name of the State in the Superior Court of Wake County, or in his discretion, in the superior court of the county in which the project or activity was undertaken by the State, to recover such cost and expenses.

In any action instituted by the Attorney General under this section, a verified and itemized statement of the expenses incurred by the State in any project or activity stated in

G.S. 104E-16

shall be filed with the complaint and shall constitute prima facie the amount due the State; and any judgment for the State thereon shall be for such amount in the absence of allegation and proof on the part of the defendant or defendants that the statement of expenses incurred by and the amount due the State is not correct because of an error in:

Calculating the amount due, or

Not properly crediting the account with any cash payment or payments or other satisfaction which may have been made thereon.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(23); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v); 2015-264, s. 54(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” three times in the first paragraph.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 54(d), effective October 1, 2015, substituted “Health and Human Services” for “Environmental Quality” three times in the first paragraph.

§ 104E-18.
Security for emergency response and perpetual maintenance costs.

No person shall use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own, possess or dispose of radioactive material until that person shall have procured and filed with the Department such bond, insurance or other security as the Commission may by regulation require. Such bond, insurance or other security shall:

Run in favor of the Radiation Protection Fund in the amount of the estimated total cost as established by the Commission that may be incurred by the State in any project or activity stated in

G.S. 104E-16

, and

Have as indemnitor on such bond or insurance an insurance company licensed to do business in the State of North Carolina.

The Commission may from time to time:

Cause an audit to be made of any person that insures itself by means of other security as provided for in subsection (a) above;

Amend or modify the estimated total cost for security established pursuant to this section; and

Provide by regulation for the discontinuance of indemnification by one insurer and the assumption thereof by another insurer, as the Commission deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this Chapter and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated hereunder.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-474, s. 4, effective November 29, 2001.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1981, c. 704, s. 12; 1987, c. 850, s. 12; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1082, s. 11; 2001-474, s. 4.

§ 104E-19.
Fees.

An annual fee in the amount set by the Department is imposed on a person who is required to be registered or licensed under this Chapter. The Department must set the fees at amounts that provide revenue to offset its costs in performing its duties under this Chapter.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 850, s. 13.

The annual fees under subsection (a) of this section shall not exceed the maximum amounts as follows:

For tanning facilities: two hundred dollars ($200.00) for the first piece of tanning equipment and thirty dollars ($30.00) for each additional piece of tanning equipment.

For the following categories of facilities registered to use X-ray tubes or X-ray equipment: clinics, chiropractors, dentists, educational, government, podiatrists, industrial, physicians, veterinarians, and other; two hundred dollars ($200.00) for the first X-ray tube or piece of X-ray equipment and thirty dollars ($30.00) for each additional X-ray tube or piece of X-ray equipment.

For the following categories of facilities registered to use X-ray tubes or X-ray equipment: industrial medical, health departments, and service; three hundred dollars ($300.00) for the first X-ray tube or piece of X-ray equipment and forty dollars ($40.00) for each additional X-ray tube or piece of X-ray equipment.

For the following categories of facilities registered to use X-ray tubes or X-ray equipment: hospitals and industrial radiography; four hundred dollars ($400.00) for the first X-ray tube or piece of X-ray equipment and fifty dollars ($50.00) for each additional X-ray tube or piece of X-ray equipment.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1981, c. 704, s. 13; 1987, c. 633, s. 9; c. 850, s. 13; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 993, s. 26; 2001-474, s. 5; 2009-451, s. 13.3(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 13.3(a), effective August 7, 2009, rewrote subsection (a), and added subsection (c).

§ 104E-20.
Prohibited uses and facilities.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own or possess any source of radiation unless licensed, registered or exempted by the Department in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated hereunder.

Shallow land burial is prohibited.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1987, c. 633, s. 10.

§ 104E-21.
Conflicting laws.

Ordinances, resolutions or regulations, now or hereafter in effect, of the governing body of a municipality or county or board of health relating to by-product, source and special nuclear materials shall not be superseded by this Chapter. Provided, that such ordinances or regulations are and continue to be consistent and compatible with the provisions of this Chapter, as amended, and rules and regulations promulgated by the Commission.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to prescribe a uniform system for the management of low-level radioactive waste and to place limitations upon the exercise by all units of local government in North Carolina of the power to regulate the management of low-level radioactive waste by special, local or private acts or resolutions as provided in G.S. 143B-285.10(b).

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1981, c. 704, s. 25.

Editor’s Note.

Section 143B-285.10, referred to in subsection (b), was repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 501, s. 1, effective July 23, 1993.

§ 104E-22.
Tort claims against persons rendering emergency assistance.

Any and all tort claims against any person which arise while that person is rendering assistance during an emergency (i) at the request of any authorized representative of the State of North Carolina or (ii) pursuant to a mutual radiological assistance agreement as provided for in G.S. 104E-11(b), shall constitute claims against this State; and the disposition thereof shall be governed by the provisions of Article 31 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. In any civil action brought against said person, the provisions of Article 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes shall apply as if such person were an employee of this State.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1.

§ 104E-23.
Penalties; injunctive relief.

Any person who violates the provisions of

G.S. 104E-15

or 104E-20, or who hinders, obstructs, or otherwise interferes with any authorized representative of the Department in the discharge of his official duties in making inspections as provided in

G.S. 104E-11

, or in impounding materials as provided in

G.S. 104E-14

, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided by law. Any person who willfully violates the provisions of

G.S. 104E-10.2

shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished as provided by law.

The Secretary may, either before or after the institution of any other action or proceedings authorized by law, institute a civil action in the superior court of the county in which the defendant in said action resides for injunctive relief to prevent a threatened or continued violation of any provision of this Chapter or any order or regulation issued pursuant to this Chapter.

History.

1975, c. 718, s. 1; 1979, c. 694, s. 5; 1981, c. 480, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 685; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 104E-24.
Administrative penalties.

The Department may impose an administrative penalty on any person:

Who fails to comply with this Chapter, any order issued hereunder, or any rules adopted pursuant to this Chapter;

Who refuses to allow an authorized representative of the Radiation Protection Commission or the [Department of] Health and Human Services a right of entry as provided for in

G.S. 104E-11

or impounding materials as provided for in

G.S. 104E-14

.

Each day of a continuing violation shall constitute a separate violation. Such penalty shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day. In determining the amount of the penalty, the Department shall consider the degree and extent of the harm caused by the violation. Any person assessed a penalty shall be notified of the assessment by registered or certified mail, and the notice shall specify the reasons for the assessment.

Any person wishing to contest a penalty or order issued under this section shall be entitled to an administrative hearing and judicial review in accordance with the procedures outlined in Articles 3, 3A, and 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

The Secretary may bring a civil action in the superior court of the county in which such violation is alleged to have occurred to recover the amount of administrative penalty whenever a person:

Who has not requested an administrative hearing fails to pay the penalty within 60 days after being notified of such penalty, or

Who has requested an administrative hearing fails to pay the penalty within 60 days after service of a written copy of the decision as provided in

G.S. 150B-36

.

The clear proceeds of penalties imposed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1981, c. 704, s. 14; 1987, c. 850, s. 14; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(24); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 1998-215, s. 47(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2015-264, s. 54(e).

Editor’s Note.

This section was amended by Session Laws 1998-215, s. 47(a) in the coded bill drafting format provided by

G.S. 120-20.1

. The act added a new subsection (c), but failed to incorporate existing subsections (c) and (d). The new subsection has been renumbered as subsection (e) and existing subsections (c) and (d) have been set out in the form above at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

G.S. 150B-36

, referred to in subdivision (d)(2), was repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 20, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to contested cases commenced on or after that date.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u) and Session Laws 2015-264, s. 54(e) both amended this section in the coded bill drafting format provided by

G.S. 120-20.1

. In subdivision (a)(2), the words “Department of” were apparently inadvertently deleted. The bracketed words “[Department of]” have been inserted at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (a)(2).

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 54(e), effective October 1, 2015, substituted “Health and Human Services” for “Department of Environmental Quality” in subdivision (a)(2).